Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Chapter 23. Mississippi Private Activity Bonds Allocation Act

§§ 31-23-1 through 31-23-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1987).

§31-23-1. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 1]

§31-23-3. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 2]

§31-23-5. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 3]

§31-23-7. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 4]

§31-23-9. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 5]

§31-23-11. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 6]

§31-23-13. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 7]

§31-23-15. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 8]

§31-23-17. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 9]

§31-23-19. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 10]

§31-23-21. [En Laws, 1985, ch 423, § 11]

§ 31-23-51.
Citation of chapter.

This act may be cited and referred to as the “Mississippi Private Activity Bonds Allocation Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1987).

§ 31-23-53.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Act” means the Mississippi Private Activity Bonds Allocation Act.

“Allocation shortfall” means the difference between a partial allocation and the full amount of the allocation requested in the approved application by reason of the exhaustion of the amount available in the threshold portion or the undesignated portion.

“Amount,” when used with respect to bonds, notices of allocation or parts of the state’s ceiling, means a principal amount measured in terms of United States dollars.

“Application” means the application for a notice of allocation required to be filed by issuers with the board pursuant to this act. All applications on file with the board shall terminate at the close of business on December 31 of each year.

“Approved application” means a completed application containing all items necessary for the board to issue a notice of allocation from the threshold portion or from the undesignated portion with respect to a project.

“Board” means the Mississippi Board of Economic Development, or its successor.

“Bond committee” means the bond committee established by the Board of Economic Development pursuant to Section 57-1-3, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Bond counsel” means an attorney or a firm of attorneys listed in the “Directory of Municipal Bond Dealers of the United States,” published by The Bond Buyer and commonly known as the “Red Book,” in the section listing municipal bond attorneys of the United States. The edition of this publication which is current from time to time shall determine the listing of bond counsel. If the “Red Book” ceases to be published or ceases to include such a listing of municipal bond attorneys of the United States, the board shall designate another list of municipal bond attorneys for purposes of the system.

“Bonds” means any bonds, notes or other obligations which would constitute private activity bonds.

“Borrower” means, with respect to private activity bonds, any person or legal entity whose trade or business would cause any bonds issued with respect to a project to constitute private activity bonds. If there is more than one (1) such person or legal entity with respect to any issue of bonds, then the term “borrower” shall mean and include each and every such person or legal entity known at the time that the issuer files an application.

“Business day” means a day on which the board is open for business; however, if December 31 is a Saturday or Sunday, “business day” shall include the preceding Friday.

“Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

“Confirmation of issuance” means the issuer’s confirmation to the board, in writing, with a reference to the appropriate notice of allocation, or with respect to the student loan portion, that the bonds authorized by a notice of allocation or student loan bonds have been issued. Such confirmation of issuance may be given in any of the following ways:

By filing with the board the information filing required by Section 149(e) of the code, with proof of filing;

By Telex, telegram, telecopier or other written means of communication to the board.

“Exempt facility bonds” means any obligations described in Section 142 of the code (excluding the obligations described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of Section 142(a) of the code to the extent that such obligations are not included as private activity bonds under Sections 146(g) and (h)) of the code.

“Exempt facility project” means a project which qualifies to be financed with exempt facility bonds.

“Exempt small issue bonds” means any obligations described in Section 144(a) of the code.

“Expiration date” means the final date on which bonds covered by a notice of allocation may be issued and by which date the board must have received confirmation of issuance.

“Federal legislation” means Public Law 99-514, Title XIII, “Tax-Exempt Bonds,” Sections 1301-1318, or any successor thereto.

“Governing body” means the mayor and board of aldermen, city council, board of supervisors, board of directors or other governing body of the issuer.

“Issued” means, with respect to any issue of bonds, that such bonds have actually been delivered and paid for in full. The date of issuance shall be the date on which the bonds have been delivered and paid for in full.

“Issuer” means any political subdivision, governmental unit, authority, corporation or other entity which has the legal authority to issue bonds and, with respect to student loan bonds, shall mean the Mississippi Higher Education Assistance Corporation, or its successor.

“Legal counsel” means an attorney, or firm of attorneys, duly authorized to practice law in the state and admitted to practice before the highest court in the state.

“Mortgage revenue bonds” means any obligations described in Section 143 of the code.

“Mortgage revenue project” means a project which qualifies to be financed with mortgage revenue bonds.

“Notice of allocation” means the notice given by the board allocating a specified amount of the state’s ceiling from the threshold portion or from the undesignated portion for a specific issue of bonds. The notice of allocation shall be in writing, shall be given to the issuer at the address specified in the application and shall specify: (i) the amount of the state’s ceiling; (ii) the amount of the threshold portion or the undesignated portion, as may be applicable, remaining after such notice of allocation is given; (iii) the amount of bonds which may be issued; and (iv) the expiration date. The notice of allocation shall be in such form as the board may determine.

“Partial allocation” means an amount allocated from the threshold portion or the undesignated portion which is less than the full amount of the allocation requested in the approved application by reason of the exhaustion of the amount available in the threshold portion or the undesignated portion.

“Private activity bonds” means any bonds which are described in Sections 103 and 141 through 150 of the code.

“Project” means, with respect to private activity bonds, the facility proposed to be financed, in whole or in part, by an issue of such bonds.

“Redevelopment bonds” means any obligation described in Section 144(c) of the code.

“Redevelopment project” means a project which qualifies to be financed with redevelopment bonds.

“Related persons” means any “related person” as that term is used in Section 144(a)(3) of the code.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

“State’s ceiling” means for any calendar year the state’s ceiling (as such term is used in Section 146 of the code) applicable to the state. The state’s ceiling shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of the federal legislation.

“Student loan allocation” means the allocation from the state’s ceiling for a particular year to the student loan portion pursuant to Section 31-23-63, excluding any portion of the state’s ceiling for any prior year allocated to a carry-forward project.

“Student loan bonds” means any bond issued, all or a major portion of the proceeds of which are to be issued directly or indirectly to finance loans to individuals for educational expenses.

“Student loan portion” means the amounts prescribed in Section 31-23-63.

“Student loan project” means a project which qualifies to be financed with student loan bonds.

“System” means the system for allocating and distributing the state’s ceiling among issuers, as outlined in this act.

“Threshold portion” means the part of the state’s ceiling to be allocated to exempt small issue bonds and to be administered as the threshold portion in accordance with Section 31-23-59.

“Undesignated portion” means the part of the state’s ceiling to be allocated to bonds other than exempt small issue bonds and to be administered in accordance with Section 31-23-61. The undesignated portion is an amount equal to the state’s ceiling less the threshold portion plus any amount transferred to the undesignated portion by the board pursuant to this act.

“Unused amount” with respect to the threshold portion or the undesignated portion means, as of any time: (i) the amount of the threshold portion or the undesignated portion with respect to which notices of allocation are authorized to be given during a calendar year, but with respect to which no notices of allocation have been given; plus (ii) the amount of the threshold portion or the undesignated portion with respect to which notices of allocation were given, but with respect to which confirmations of issuance were not received by the board on or before the applicable expiration date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1987).

§ 31-23-55.
Powers and duties of board.

The board shall administer, operate and manage the system. Any powers or duties set forth herein to be exercised or performed by the board shall be exercised or performed by the board or one or more individuals designated by the board for such purpose. Without limiting the generality of the board’s power and authority to administer, operate and manage the system, the board shall make such determinations and decisions, promulgate such rules, establish such criteria, require the use of such forms, establish such procedures and otherwise administer, operate and manage the system in such respects as may be, in the board’s determination, necessary, desirable or incident to its responsibilities as the administrator, operator and manager of the system. The board shall have the power and authority to administer, operate and manage the system in all situations and circumstances, both foreseen and unforeseen, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power and authority to resolve and deal with any conflicts or inconsistencies in this act or which may arise in administering this act, giving due regard to the purpose of this act to allocate fairly the state’s ceiling among issuers and to promote further the economic and educational development and public welfare of the state. The board may promulgate such regulations and establish additional criteria for applicants as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of this act. If the board shall determine that there has been an abuse of the process of applying for a notice of allocation, the board may take, in its discretion, any action it may deem appropriate, including, without limitation, denial or, if the bonds for which the notice of allocation were given have not been issued, withdrawal of the notice of allocation with respect to which the abuse occurred, and/or denial of future applications in which the borrower found to have abused the process of applying for a notice of allocation (or any related person thereto) will be a borrower.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1987).

§ 31-23-57.
Ceiling for issuance of private activity bonds; records; public notice.

The state’s ceiling for the issuance of private activity bonds is hereby established, and it shall be determined annually by the board in accordance with the federal legislation. The amount of the state’s ceiling available at any time shall be the amount determined by the board, which results from: (a) subtracting from the state’s ceiling the amount of bonds issued during the year of calculation pursuant to notices of allocation issued during the year of calculation and with respect to which confirmation of issuance has been received by the board on or before the applicable expiration date; and (b) subtracting from the state’s ceiling the amount of notices of allocation issued during the year of calculation and which are outstanding but with respect to which the expiration date has not occurred. The state’s ceiling shall be divided annually, for purposes of administering the system into two (2) parts: the threshold portion and the undesignated portion. The board shall keep records of the amount of the state’s ceiling available at any given time, including the amount of the threshold portion and the undesignated portion available for notices of allocation at any given time, and shall make available to the public, by periodic news releases and such other means as the board may determine to be appropriate, information with respect to the amount of the state’s ceiling, the threshold portion and the undesignated portion. All applications shall apply for, and all notices of allocation shall be given in integrals of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1987).

§ 31-23-59.
Threshold portion of ceiling; applications for notices of allocation; fee; notices of allocation; confirmation of issuance; transfer of funds.

The threshold portion of the state’s ceiling is hereby established in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the state’s ceiling for the year of calculation. Applications for notices of allocation from the threshold portion shall be received and acted on by the board as set forth in this section:

All applications shall be filed on a form promulgated from time to time by the board. The application form shall set forth and include:

The name and address of the issuer and each borrower;

The dollar amount of the threshold portion requested;

Whether the applicant requests that a partial allocation be granted in the event the board is unable to grant a notice of allocation for the full amount of the threshold portion requested;

Whether, if a partial allocation is made, the applicant wishes the allocation shortfall to be treated as a separate application;

Such additional qualifying criteria as the board may establish; and

An allocation fee of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) to be deposited in the revolving fund established in Section 57-1-66.

In addition, applications filed on or after November 1 of each year shall be accompanied by either of the following (unless previously filed with the board):

A certified copy of the transcript of the proceeding of the governing body authorizing the issuance of the bonds; or

1. A copy of the inducement resolution or other similar official action taken by the issuer with respect to the project which is the subject of the application, certified by an officer of the issuer; and

2. A written statement of legal counsel or bond counsel, addressed to the board, to the effect that the issuer is authorized under the law of the state to issue bonds for projects of the same type and nature as the project which is the subject of the application. This statement shall cite by constitutional or statutory reference the provision of the constitution or law of the state which authorizes the bonds for the project; and

3. Either

a. In the case of a private placement of bonds, a written commitment from a lender, financial institution, underwriter or investment banker, addressed to the board, the borrower or the issuer, stating that the lender, financial institution, underwriter or investment banker, as the case may be, has agreed to purchase the bonds upon delivery by the issuer and setting forth the rate of interest to be borne by the bonds; or

b. In the case of a public offering of bonds, a letter from a lender, financial institution, underwriter or investment banker addressed to the board, the borrower or the issuer, stating that the lender, financial institution, underwriter or investment banker, as the case may be, has agreed to tender a contract for the purchase of the bonds; and

The board shall stamp or otherwise designate the date and time on which it receives each application. The application shall be considered approved upon review and approval by the bond committee or its designee pursuant to rules, regulations or qualifying criteria promulgated by the board. The application shall be stamped approved when each of the items required under paragraph (a) or paragraphs (a) and (b) above, as applicable, has been received in proper form by the board and approved by the bond committee or its designee. Any application which is not in proper form and which is determined not to be an approved application may be corrected and refiled at any time. Receipt shall be deemed to occur only on a business day.

Within ten (10) days or no later than the last business day of the calendar year after the board receives the application the board shall:

Give its notice of allocation, approving or denying the allocation requested by such application; or

Give its notice of allocation, approving or denying less than the full amount requested by such application, if the applicant has so requested a partial allocation in the event the board is unable to approve the allocation requested; in such event, if the applicant has requested that the allocation shortfall be treated as a separate application, such allocation shortfall shall be treated as though it were a separate application filed on the date and time on which the original application was filed; or

Give notice to the issuer that the allocation requested by the application has not been approved or denied because the threshold portion has been exhausted or is insufficient to make the requested allocation, and request written direction from the issuer or the borrower as to whether the board should retain the application for approval in the future or whether the application should be withdrawn or otherwise. If the threshold portion is insufficient to make the requested allocation and the applicant requests the board to hold its approved application until the full amount of the requested allocation can be granted, the board shall not give notices of allocation from the threshold portion for approved applications filed later than such approved application unless the board determines that it is unlikely that the full amount requested in such approved application will be available during the calendar year.

Notices of allocation shall be given with respect to approved applications in the chronological order, by date and time, in which the approved applications were received by the board (except as otherwise provided in this paragraph), shall bear an effective date beginning on the date of issuance of the notice of allocation, and shall bear an expiration date as follows:

Sixty (60) calendar days from the date of issuance, if issued on or after January 1, and on or before October 15;

December 15, if issued after October 15, and prior to December 9;

Seven (7) calendar days from the date of issuance, if issued on or after December 9, but in no event shall the expiration date be later than December 31.

If at any time none of the threshold portion remains available for notices of allocation, but additional amounts of the threshold portion become available later in the year because confirmation of issuance was not received by the board on or before the applicable expiration date for any notice of allocation, or because the board has transferred any portion of the state’s ceiling to the threshold portion pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the board shall give a notice of allocation with respect to approved applications earlier received, including any approved applications which failed to receive a notice of allocation pursuant to paragraph (d) above or for which an allocation shortfall was treated as a separate application. Such notices of allocation shall be given, to the extent that the threshold portion becomes available at such later time, with respect to approved applications in chronological order, by date and time, in which they were received by the board (except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d)(iii) of this section).

When bonds covered by a notice of allocation have been issued, confirmation of issuance shall be filed with the board on or before the expiration date.

If confirmation of issuance is not received by the board on or before the applicable expiration date, the amount covered by the particular notice of allocation shall automatically be returned to, and added to, the threshold portion, and shall be available for use in other notices of allocation; provided, if confirmation of issuance is received after the applicable expiration date, the board may, in its discretion and provided amounts are available for such project, treat such bonds as though confirmation of issuance had been received on or before the applicable expiration date.

If confirmation of issuance is not received by the board on or before the applicable expiration date with respect to a notice of allocation, the issuer may file additional applications after the expiration date with respect to all or any part of the issue of bonds covered by such notice of allocation, but such applications shall be treated as filed on the next day after actually filed (and at the time of day such application was filed) for purposes of determining which applications shall receive a notice of allocation where the amount of approved applications on the actual day of filing exceeds the amount of the threshold portion available at that time for notices of allocation.

If, and to the extent that, amounts requested pursuant to approved applications from the undesignated portion exceed the unused amount of the undesignated portion, the board may, at any time and from time to time between July 1 and October 31 of each year, transfer to the undesignated portion all or any part of the unused amount of the threshold portion in excess of the following percentages of the original threshold portion for that year:

Month of Transfer
Percentage of Original Threshold Portion July 60% August 50% September 40% October 30%

Click to view

If, and to the extent that, amounts requested pursuant to approved applicationsfromthe undesignated portion exceed the unused amount of the undesignated portion, the board may, at any time and from time to time on or after November 1 of each year, transfer all or any part of the unused amount of the threshold portion to the undesignated portion.

If, and to the extent that, amounts requested pursuant to approved applications from the threshold portion exceed the unused amount of the threshold portion, the board may, at any time and from time to time between June 1 and October 31 of each year, transfer to the threshold portion all or any part of the unused amount of the undesignated portioninexcess of the following percentages of the original undesignatedportionfor that year:

Month of Transfer
Percentage of Original Threshold Portion June 30% July 25% August 20% September 15% October 10%

Click to view

If, and to the extent that, amounts requested pursuant to approved applicationsfromthe threshold portion exceed the unused amount of the thresholdportion,the board may, at any time and from time to time on or afterNovember1 of each year, transfer all or any part of the unused amountof theundesignated portion to the threshold portion.

No fee shall be required at any time for allocations under the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation Beginning Farmer Program, Section 57-10-301 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 5; Laws, 1991, ch. 584, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1993).

§ 31-23-61.
Undesignated portion of ceiling; applications for notices of allocation; fee; notices of allocation; confirmation of issuance.

The undesignated portion of the state’s ceiling is hereby established in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the state’s ceiling. The undesignated portion shall include any amounts transferred to the undesignated portion by the board pursuant to this chapter. All allocations for bonds other than exempt small issue bonds shall be granted from the undesignated portion. Applications for notices of allocation from the undesignated portion shall be received and acted upon as follows:

All applications shall be filed on a form promulgated from time to time by the board. The application form shall set forth: (i) the name and address of the issuer and each borrower; (ii) the dollar amount of the undesignated portion requested; (iii) whether the applicant requests that a partial allocation be granted in the event the board is unable to grant a notice of allocation for the full amount of the undesignated portion requested.

In addition, applications filed on or after November 1 of each year shall be accompanied by the following:

The items which are required to accompany applications for notices of allocation from the threshold portion set forth in Section 31-23-59(b)(i) or Section 31-23-59(b)(ii), except that such items shall specify amounts as to the undesignated portion.

A written opinion of bond counsel, addressed to the board to the effect that the bonds which are covered by the application will, based upon the information available at that time to such bond counsel, qualify as tax-exempt bonds under applicable federal law when issued.

An allocation application fee of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) to be deposited in the revolving fund provided for in Section 57-1-66.

The board shall stamp or otherwise designate the date and time on which it receives each application. The application shall be considered approved upon review and approval by the bond committee or its designee pursuant to rules, regulations or qualifying criteria promulgated by the board. The application shall be stamped approved when each of the items required under paragraphs (a) and (b) above, as applicable, has been received in proper form by the board and approved by the bond committee or its designee. Any application which is not in proper form and which is determined not to be an approved application may be corrected and refiled at any time. Receipt shall be deemed to occur only on a business day.

Within ten (10) days or no later than the last business day of the calendar year after the board receives the approved application the board shall:

Give its notice of allocation, approving the allocation requested by such application; or

Give its notice of partial allocation, approving less than the full amount of the allocation requested by such application, if the applicant has so requested a partial allocation in the event the board is unable to approve the allocation requested. In such event, if the applicant has requested that the allocation shortfall be treated as a separate application, such allocation shortfall shall be treated as though it were a separate application filed on the date and time on which the original application was filed; or

Give notice to the issuer that the allocation requested by the application has not been approved because the undesignated portion has been exhausted, or is insufficient to make the requested allocation and request written direction from the issuer or the borrower as to whether the board should retain the application for approval in the future or whether the application should be withdrawn or otherwise.

Such notices of allocation shall be given with respect to approved applications in chronological order, by date and time, in which the approved applications were received by the board, shall bear an effective date beginning on the date of issuance of the notice of allocation, and shall bear an expiration date as follows:

Sixty (60) calendar days from the date of issuance, if issued on or after January 1, and on or before October 15.

December 15, if issued after October 15 and prior to December 9.

Seven (7) calendar days from the date of issuance, if issued on or after December 9, but in no event shall an expiration date be later than December 31.

If at any time none of the undesignated portion remains available for notices of allocation, but additional amounts of the undesignated portion become available later in the year because confirmation of issuance was not received by the board on or before the applicable expiration date for any notice of allocation or because the board has transferred any portion of the state’s ceiling to the undesignated portion pursuant to this chapter, the board shall give a notice of allocation with respect to approved applications earlier received, including any approved applications which failed to receive a notice of allocation pursuant to paragraph (d) above or for which an allocation shortfall was treated as a separate application. Such notices of allocation shall be given to the extent that the undesignated portion becomes available at such later times, with respect to approved applications in chronological order, by date and time, in which they were received by the board.

When bonds covered by a notice of allocation have been issued, confirmation of issuance shall be filed with the board on or before the expiration date.

If confirmation of issuance is not received by the board on or before the applicable expiration date, the amount covered by the particular notice of allocation shall automatically be returned to, and added to, the undesignated portion, and shall be available for use in other notices of allocation; provided, if confirmation of issuance is received after the applicable expiration date, the board may, in its discretion and provided amounts are available for such project, treat such bonds as though confirmation of issuance had been received on or before the applicable expiration date.

If confirmation of issuance is not received by the board on or before the applicable expiration date with respect to a notice of allocation from the undesignated portion, the issuer may file additional applications after the expiration date with respect to all or any part of the issue of bonds covered by such notice of allocation, but such applications shall be treated as filed on the next day after actually filed (and at the time of day such application was filed) for purposes of determining which applications shall receive a notice of allocation where the amount of approved applications on the actual day of filing exceeds the amount of the undesignated portion available at that time for notices of allocation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 6; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 584, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 31-23-63.
Student loan portion of ceiling; allocations and transfers; issuance of student loan bonds.

The student loan portion of the state’s ceiling is hereby established, and an allocation thereto is hereby made from the undesignated portion in the amount of Thirteen Million Dollars ($13,000,000.00) (excluding carry-forward elections) in calendar year 1987. For the 1989 calendar year a total of Thirty-five Million Dollars ($35,000,000.00), less the aggregate of all carry-forward allocations to student loan projects from the state’s ceiling for 1987 and 1988 (other than any carry-forward of all or part of the Thirteen Million Dollars ($13,000,000.00) allocation for 1987 described above), is hereby allocated from the undesignated portion to the student loan portion. Additional amounts may be allocated to the student loan portion pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-23-61, and such notices of allocation shall remain valid from the date of issuance until the last business day of that year, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 31-23-61(e). The student loan portion shall also include any other allocations to student loan projects pursuant to this act.

Upon written request of the board, the issuer of student loan bonds shall promptly provide a written certification to the board as to the amount available in the student loan allocation which the issuer reasonably expects to utilize. Any amount of the student loan allocation which the issuer does not certify that it reasonably expects to utilize, and which another issuer may utilize in accordance with the federal legislation, may be transferred from time to time by the board, in whole or in part, to the threshold portion or the undesignated portion. If such a transfer is made, an amount equal to that transferred shall be allocated from the undesignated portion of the state’s ceiling to the student loan portion in the succeeding calendar year in addition to the amounts allocated to the student loan portion for that year as set forth above.

Student loan bonds may be issued at any time to the full extent of the amount available in the student loan portion, but not in excess of such amount. Confirmation of issuance of student loan bonds shall be furnished to the board by the issuer within thirty (30) business days after the issuance, but in any event on or before the last business day of the year in which such bonds were issued.

If there is any unused amount remaining in the student loan allocation on the last business day of a year, and if the issuer of student loan bonds has filed with the board one or more elections to treat one or more student loan projects as carry-forward projects, and has in the election specified the carry-forward amount or amounts, and identified the purpose for which the carry-forward is elected, the board shall allocate such unused amounts to such student loan project or projects, and such student loan project or projects shall be treated as a carry-forward project or projects in the specified carry-forward amount under the federal legislation.

For purposes of determining unused amounts and for purposes of determining the amount of the state’s ceiling available pursuant to Section 31-23-57, except as provided in subsection (2) above, during 1987 and 1989 amounts automatically allocated to the student loan portion as described above shall be treated as though a notice of allocation had been issued on January 1 of the applicable year, expiring on the last business day of such year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 522, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1987).